fi: Langaton monihuonealusta: Vain AirPlay 2; Sisäänrakennettu Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Ei mitään; Sonos; Muu
it: Piattaforma wireless multi-room: Solo AirPlay 2; Chromecast integrato; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Nessuna; Sonos; Altro
tr: Kablosuz çok odalı platform: Sadece AirPlay 2; Dahili Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Hiçbiri; Sonos; Diğer
nb: Trådløs multirom plattform: Kun AirPlay 2; Innebygd Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Ingen; Sonos; Annet
th: แพลตฟอร์มไร้สายหลายห้อง: AirPlay 2 เท่านั้น; Chromecast ในตัว; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; ไม่มี; Sonos; อื่นๆ
pl: Bezprzewodowa platforma multiroom: Tylko AirPlay 2; Wbudowany Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Brak; Sonos; Inne
sl-SI: Platforma brezžičnega večprostorskega sistema: Samo AirPlay 2; Vgrajen chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Brez; Sonos; Drugo
zh-TW: 無線多房間平台: 僅 AirPlay 2; 內建 Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; 無; Sonos; 其他
fr: Plateforme multi-pièces sans fil: AirPlay 2 uniquement; Chromecast intégré; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Aucune; Sonos; Autre
nl: Draadloos multi-room platform: Alleen AirPlay 2; Chromecast ingebouwd; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Geen; Sonos; Andere
sk-SK: Bezdrôtová platforma pre viacero miestností: Iba AirPlay 2; Vstavaný Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Žiadny; Sonos; Iné
hu: Vezeték nélküli többszobás platform: Csak AirPlay 2; Beépített Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Egyik sem; Sonos; Egyéb
ja: ワイヤレスマルチルームプラットフォーム: AirPlay 2 のみ; Chromecast built-in; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; なし; Sonos; その他
vi: Nền tảng đa phòng không dây: Chỉ AirPlay 2; Chromecast tích hợp; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Không có; Sonos; Khác
ru: Платформа беспроводной мультирум-системы: Только AirPlay 2; Встроенный Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Нет; Sonos; Другой
de: Drahtlose Multiroom-Plattform: Nur AirPlay 2; Integrierter Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Keine; Sonos; Sonstiges
el: Πλατφόρμα ασύρματου πολυδωματίου: Μόνο AirPlay 2; Ενσωματωμένο chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Καμία; Sonos; Άλλο
en: Wireless multi-room platform: AirPlay 2 only; Chromecast built-in; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; None; Sonos; Other
cs: Bezdrátová multi-room platforma: Pouze AirPlay 2; Vestavěný chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Žádný; Sonos; Jiné
bg-BG: Безжична платформа за няколко помещения: Само AirPlay 2; Вграден Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Няма; Sonos; Други
da: Trådløs multirum-platform: Kun AirPlay 2; Chromecast indbygget; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Ingen; Sonos; Andet
pt-BR: Plataforma sem fio multi-sala: Somente AirPlay 2; Chromecast integrado; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Nenhum; Sonos; Outro
zh-CN: 无线多房间平台: 仅 AirPlay 2; 内置 Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; 无; Sonos; 其他
sv: Trådlös flerrumsplattform: Endast AirPlay 2; Inbyggd Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Inga; Sonos; Övrigt
hr-HR: Bežična višesobna platforma: Samo AirPlay 2; Ugrađen chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Nema; Sonos; Ostalo
ro-RO: Platformă wireless multi-cameră: Doar AirPlay 2; Chromecast integrat; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Niciuna; Sonos; Altele
ko: 무선 멀티룸 플랫폼: AirPlay 2 전용; 크롬캐스트 내장; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; 없음; Sonos; 기타
es: Plataforma multihabitación inalámbrica: Solo AirPlay 2; Chromecast integrado; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Ninguno; Sonos; Otros
lt-LT: Belaidžio daugiakambario platforma: Tik AirPlay 2; Integruotas Chromecast; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Nėra; Sonos; Kita
pt-PT: Plataforma sem fios multi-sala: Apenas AirPlay 2; Chromecast integrado; DTS Play-Fi; HEOS; MusicCast; Nenhum; Sonos; Outro